Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2805
County Bridge Match Program; created; termination; County Bridge Match Working Group.

(1) The County Bridge Match Program is created. The department shall administer the program using funds from the Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund. The purpose of the program is to promote innovative solutions and provide additional funding to accelerate the repair and replacement of deficient bridges on the county road system. Participation by counties in the program shall be voluntary.

(2) The County Bridge Match Working Group is hereby created. The Governor shall appoint two representatives to serve on the working group from a list of county highway superintendents, county surveyors, or county engineers submitted by a statewide association representing county officials. The Director-State Engineer shall select three representatives of the department to serve on the working group. The working group shall develop the program, including participation criteria and matching fund requirements for counties, and shall score the applications and award the funds. A meeting of the working group does not constitute a meeting as defined in section 84-1409.

(3) The County Bridge Match Program terminates on June 30, 2029.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB683, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB1030, § 1.
June 30, 2029